Utah statutes.
39-6-99.   Aggravated arson -- Arson.

A person subject to this chapter who willfully and maliciously burns or sets on fire:

(1)  an inhabitable dwelling, or any other structure, movable or immovable, and the person knows or has reason to know that at the time there is a human being within, is guilty of aggravated arson and shall be punished as a military court directs; and

(2)  the property of another except under Subsection (1), is guilty of arson and shall be punished as a military court directs.

